Louisiana, session 2026, HB197.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:22.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§22.1. Artificial intelligence; authorized uses; prohibited uses; penalties
A. As used in this Section:
(1) "Artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system that can, for a
given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations or
decisions influencing real or virtual environments. Artificial intelligence systems
use machine and human-based inputs to perceive real and virtual environments,
abstract such perceptions into models through analysis in an automated manner, and
use model inference to formulate options for information or action.
(2) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Health.
(3) "Healthcare professional" means any professional providing healthcare
services or treatment licensed in accordance with this Title or permitted to practice
in this state through an interstate compact or agreement.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-420 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 197
(4) "Healthcare provider" means a person, partnership, limited liability
partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or facility licensed or certified
by this state to provide healthcare services.
B. A healthcare provider may use artificial intelligence to assist with an
administrative or analytical task related to providing healthcare services including
but not limited to any of the following:
(1) To prepare and maintain a client's records and notes.
(2) To manage appointment scheduling and reminders.
(3) To process billing or insurance claims.
(4) To analyze anonymized data to track client progress or identify trends.
(5) To identify and organize an external resource or a referral for a patient.
(6) To draft a general communication related to therapy logistics that does
not include therapeutic advice.
C. A healthcare provider shall not utilize artificial intelligence without
review and approval by a licensed healthcare professional to do any of the following:
(1) Make a decision related to treatment or diagnosis.
(2) Interact directly with a patient in any form of communication.
(3) Generate a therapeutic recommendation or treatment plan.
D.(1) A healthcare provider found in violation of this Section shall pay a
civil penalty in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars per violation to the
department.
(2)(a) The department may investigate any complaints of actual, alleged, or
suspected violations of this Section against healthcare providers licensed or certified
by the department.
(b) The department may refer complaints of actual, alleged, or suspected
violations of this Section to the appropriate licensing board or agency with
jurisdiction over the healthcare provider.
(3) The department shall promulgate rules to implement the provisions of
this Section.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-420 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 197